Mississippi statutes. Title 71. Labor and Industry
General Provisions
§ 71-3-85.
Workers’ compensation commission.

There is hereby created a commission to be known as the workmen’s compensation commission, consisting of three (3) members, who shall devote their entire time to the duties of the office. The governor shall appoint the members of the commission, by and with the consent of the Mississippi State Senate, one (1) for a term of two (2) years, one (1) for a term of four (4) years, and one (1) for a term of six (6) years. Upon the expiration of each term as above set forth, the governor shall appoint a successor for a term of six (6) years, and thereafter the term of office of each commissioner shall be for six (6) years. One (1) member shall be a person who by reason of his previous vocation or affiliation can be classed as a representative of employers, and one (1) member shall be a person who by reason of his previous vocation or affiliation can be classed as a representative of employees. One (1) member shall be an attorney at law of recognized ability with at least five (5) years’ active practice in Mississippi prior to his appointment. The governor shall designate the chairman of the commission, whose term of chairman shall run concurrently with his appointment as a commissioner.

The chairman shall be the administrative head of the commission and shall have the final authority in all matters relating to assignment of cases for hearing and trial and the administrative work of the commission and its employees, except in the promulgation of rules and regulations wherein the commission shall act as a body, and in the trial and determination of cases as otherwise provided.

Upon the expiration of the term of a commissioner, he shall continue to serve until his successor has been appointed. Because cumulative experience is conspicuously essential to the proper administration of a workmen’s compensation law, it is declared to be in the public interest to continue workmen’s compensation commissioners in office as long as efficiency is demonstrated. A commissioner may be removed for cause prior to the expiration of his term, but shall be furnished a written copy of the charges against him and shall be accorded a public hearing.

Each member of the commission and each administrative law judge shall receive an annual salary fixed by the legislature.

A vacancy in the commission, if there remain two (2) members of it, shall not impair the authority of such two (2) members to act. In case of illness or continued absence for other reasons, the same authority of such two (2) members shall apply.

The commission shall have the powers and duties necessary for effecting the purposes of this chapter, including the powers of a court of record for compelling the attendance of witnesses, examining them under oath, and compelling the production of books, papers, documents and objects relevant to the determination of a claim for compensation, and the power to adopt rules and regulations and make or approve the forms relating to notices of injuries, payment of claims and other purposes. The authority of the commission and its duly authorized representatives to investigate and determine claims for compensation shall include the right to enter the premises where an injury occurred, to ascertain its causes and circumstances.

The office of the commission shall be situated in the City of Jackson, but hearings may be held at such places as it may deem most convenient for the proper and speedy performance of its duties. The commission is authorized, if it deems it necessary for the convenient and efficient dispatch of business, to lease office space and facilities in other than publicly owned buildings.

The commission shall adopt detailed rules and regulations for implementing the purposes of this chapter at hearings attended by the main parties interested. Such rules, upon adoption, shall be published and be at all reasonable times made available to the public and, if not inconsistent with law, shall be binding upon those participating in the responsibilities and benefits of the workmen’s compensation law.

The commission shall adopt or approve the forms required for administering the chapter, such notices of injury, application for benefits, receipts for compensation and all other forms needed to assure the orderly and prompt operation of the law, and may require the exclusive use of any or all such approved forms.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6998-43; Laws, 1948, ch. 354, § 37; Laws, 1950, ch. 412, § 15; Laws, 1956, ch. 345, § 2; Laws, 1958, ch. 478; Laws, 1962, ch. 474, § 1; Laws, 1966, ch. 445, § 18; Laws, 1980, ch. 475, § 2; reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 473, § 43; reenacted without change, Laws, 1990, ch. 405, § 45, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 71-3-87.
Official bond.

Members of the commission shall give bond in the sum of Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) of a surety company authorized to do business in the state, for the faithful performance of their duties. The premium upon such bonds shall be paid out of the workmen’s compensation administration fund.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6998-44; Laws, 1948, ch. 354, § 38; reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, ch. 473, § 44; reenacted without change, Laws, 1990, ch. 405, § 46, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 71-3-89.
Seal.

The commission shall have a seal for authentication of its orders, awards, and proceedings, upon which shall be inscribed the words “workmen’s compensation commission-Mississippi-seal,” and it shall be judicially noticed.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6998-45; Laws, 1948, ch. 354, § 39; reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, ch. 473, § 45; reenacted without change, Laws, 1990, ch. 405, § 47, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 71-3-91.
Traveling expenses.

Commissioners and employees of the commission shall receive their necessary traveling expenses and costs of subsistence while traveling on official business and away from their designated station. Expense accounts shall be sworn to by the person presenting them and, upon approval by the chairman of the commission, shall be allowed and paid as provided in Section 71-3-97.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6998-46; Laws, 1948, ch. 354, § 40; Laws, 1950, ch. 412, § 16; reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, ch. 473, § 46; reenacted without change, Laws, 1990, ch. 405, § 48, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 71-3-93.
Administrative staff.

The commission shall appoint such officers and employees as are necessary adequately to administer the Workers’ Compensation Law, including not more than eight (8) administrative judges to be appointed by the commission with the consent of the Governor and an executive director who shall serve at the will of the commission and shall have such administrative duties as are assigned by the commission, a secretary, a statistician, a rehabilitation unit, and any other employees deemed essential to the administration of the law including court reporters whose salaries shall be the same as set for court reporters for circuit and chancery courts by Section 9-13-19. The annual salary of the executive director shall be equal to that of an administrative judge. An administrative judge shall be a member of the Mississippi State Bar and shall have a minimum of three (3) years’ experience in the practice of law.

All salaries not specifically fixed by law shall be set by the commission. The establishing of a merit system or career service for employees of the commission is declared to be in the public interest because of the length of time required for understanding the details and problems involved in administering this legislation. The commission shall establish and enforce fair and reasonable rules for the appointment, promotion and demotion of personnel. All employees of the commission with the exception of medical consultants shall devote their entire time to the duties of their office.

For the purpose of conducting hearings and making decisions upon claims, the administrative judge or administrative judges appointed by the commission shall have the authority of a commissioner.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6998-47; Laws, 1948, ch. 354, § 41; Laws, 1950, ch. 412, § 17; Laws, 1956, ch. 345, § 3; Laws, 1962, ch. 474, § 2; Laws, 1966, ch. 455, § 1; Laws, 1974, ch. 384; Laws, 1977, ch. 381; Laws, 1978, ch. 428, § 1; Laws, 1980, ch. 475, § 3; reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 473, § 47; reenacted without change, Laws, 1990, ch. 405, § 49; Laws, 1993, ch. 552, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved April 13, 1993).

§ 71-3-95.
Payment of operating expense.

The commission shall make such expenditures as may be necessary for the adequate administration of this chapter, including salaries and traveling expense, the cost of personal services, office rent at the seat of government and elsewhere, the purchase of books, periodicals, office equipment and supplies, printing and binding reports, the cost of membership in official organizations, and other purposes. All expenditures of the commission in the administration of this chapter shall be allowed and paid out of the State General Fund as provided in Section 71-3-100, upon the presentation of itemized vouchers therefor approved by the chairman of the commission.

The commission is authorized, in its discretion, to transfer a sum or sums not to exceed Two Hundred Thousand Dollars ($200,000.00) to the Second Injury Fund. The commission is further authorized, in its discretion, to replace any funds so transferred in the event that funds become available.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6998-48; Laws, 1948, ch. 354, § 42; Laws, 1950, ch. 412, § 18; reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, ch. 473, § 48; Laws, 1984, ch. 497, § 2; Laws, 1987, ch. 361, § 7; reenacted without change, Laws, 1990, ch. 405, § 50; Laws 2017, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 7, § 28, eff from and after passage (approved June 23, 2017).

§ 71-3-97.
Collection of civil penalties authorized by chapter; deposit of civil penalties into State General Fund.

All civil penalties provided in this chapter, if not voluntarily paid, may be collected by civil suit brought by the commission, and shall be paid into the State General Fund.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6998-49; Laws, 1948, ch. 354, § 43; reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, ch. 473, § 49; reenacted without change, Laws, 1990, ch. 405, § 51; Laws 2017, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 7, § 29, eff from and after passage (approved June 23, 2017).

§ 71-3-99.
Budget and collection procedure.

The commission shall estimate annually in advance the amounts necessary for the administration of this chapter, in the following manner:

The commission shall, as soon as practicable after the first day of January in each year, determine the expense of administration of this chapter for the one-year period preceding the first day of January. The expense of administration for such period shall be used as the basis for determining the amount to be assessed against each carrier and self-insurer in order to provide for the expenses of the administration of this chapter for the one-year period.

Each carrier and self-insurer shall be assessed Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00). The proceeds of such assessment shall be deducted from the estimate of total expenses and the remaining expenses of administration shall be prorated among the carriers writing compensation insurance in the state and self-insurers. The gross claims for compensation and medical services and supplies paid by the insurance carriers and self-insurers is the basis for computing the amount to be assessed, in the proportion that the total gross claims for compensation and medical services and supplies paid by such carrier or self-insurer during the preceding one-year period bore to the total gross claims for compensation and medical supplies and services paid by all carriers and self-insurers during such period. This amount may be assessed as a specific amount or as a percentage of gross claims for compensation and medical supplies and services paid by the insurance carriers and self-insurers as the commission may direct, and shall be such amount as shall be reasonably necessary to defray the necessary expense of such administration.

The commission shall provide by regulation for the collection of the amounts assessed against each carrier and self-insurer. Such amounts shall be paid within thirty (30) days from the date that notice is served upon such carrier. If such amounts are not paid within such period, there may be assessed, for each thirty (30) days the amount so assessed remains unpaid, a civil penalty equal to ten percent (10%) of the amount so unpaid, which shall be collected at the same time and as a part of the amount assessed.

If any carrier or self-insurer fails to pay the amounts assessed against it under the provisions of this section within sixty (60) days from the time such notice is served, the commission may suspend or revoke the authorization to insure compensation or to be self-insured.

All amounts collected under the provisions of this section shall be paid into the State General Fund as provided in Section 71-3-100.

The commission may require from each carrier and self-insurer, at such time and in accordance with regulations as the commission may prescribe, reports in respect to all payments of compensation and medical supplies and services by such carriers or self-insurers during each prior period, and may determine the amounts paid by each carrier and self-insurer and the amounts paid by all carriers and self-insurers during such period.

Every carrier and self-insurer shall file with the commission on or before the first day of March of each year, a statement on the prescribed forms showing the gross claims for compensation and medical services and supplies paid by such carrier or self-insurer during the preceding one-year period ending on the thirty-first day of December. Any carrier or self-insurer which neglects to make and file its annual written statement within the time provided in this chapter shall pay to the commission Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each day’s neglect.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6998-50; Laws, 1948, ch. 354, § 44; Laws, 1950, ch. 412, § 19; Laws, 1978, ch. 320, § 1; reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 473, § 50; Laws, 1987, ch. 361, § 8; reenacted without change, Laws, 1990, ch. 405, § 52; Laws, 2017, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 7, § 30, eff from and after passage (approved June 23, 2017).

§ 71-3-100.
Payment and deposit in State General Fund of funds received by Workers’ Compensation Commission; funding of commission expenses.

All funds received by the Workers’ Compensation Commission, as established by Section 71-3-85 et seq., shall be paid to the State Treasurer, who shall issue receipts therefor and who shall deposit such funds into the State General Fund in the State Treasury.

From and after July 1, 2016, the expenses of the Workers’ Compensation Commission shall be defrayed by appropriation from the State General Fund and all user charges and fees authorized by Section 71-3-85 et seq. shall be deposited into the State General Fund as authorized by law.

From and after July 1, 2016, the Workers’ Compensation Commission shall not charge another state agency a fee, assessment, rent or other charge for services or resources received by authority of Section 71-3-85 et seq.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1973, ch. 381, § 4; reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 473, § 51; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 272; reenacted without change, Laws, 1990, ch. 405, § 53; Laws, 2016, ch. 459, § 67; Laws 2017, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 7, § 31, eff from and after passage (approved June 23, 2017).

§ 71-3-101.
Registration of insurance companies.

Each insurance company and all other carriers which desire to write workmen’s compensation insurance in compliance with this chapter shall be required, before writing such insurance, to register with the workmen’s compensation commission and pay a registration fee of One Hundred Dollars ($100.00). This shall be deposited by the commission in the administration expense fund.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6998-51; Laws, 1948, ch. 354, § 45; reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, ch. 473, § 52; reenacted without change, Laws, 1990, ch. 405, § 54, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 71-3-103.
Annual report.

The commission shall each calendar year make a report to the governor upon the operation of this chapter, including suggestions and recommendations as to improvements in the law and administration, a detailed statement of receipts and disbursements, and an exposition of industrial injury experience and compensation and medical cost.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6998-52; Laws, 1948, ch. 354, § 46; Laws, 1950, ch. 412, § 20; reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, ch. 473, § 53; reenacted without change, Laws, 1990, ch. 405, § 55, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 71-3-105.
Rehabilitation.

The commission shall cooperate with federal, state, and local agencies in the rehabilitation of handicapped workers, and shall promptly report to the proper authority industrial injury cases in which retraining or job placement may be needed.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6998-53; Laws, 1948, ch. 354, § 47; reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, ch. 473, § 54; reenacted without change, Laws, 1990, ch. 405, § 56, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 71-3-107.
Compensation and death benefits for minors illegally employed.

Compensation and death benefits shall be double the amount otherwise payable if the injured employee at the time of the injury is a minor under eighteen (18) years of age employed, permitted, or suffered to work in violation of any provision of the Mississippi labor laws. The employer alone and not the insurance carrier shall be liable for such increased compensation or increased death benefits. Any provision in an insurance policy undertaking to relieve an employer from such increased liability shall be void. The provisions of this section shall not apply, and double compensation and double death benefits shall not be payable, for death or injury to an employee under eighteen (18) years of age employed in the following programs:

Students fourteen (14) years of age and over and regularly enrolled in an accredited secondary school or college and employed between regular terms or semesters with the written consent of their parent or parents or person standing in loco parentis.

Students fourteen (14) years of age and over and employed in on-the-job training as a part of a regular program of education in an accredited secondary school with the written consent of their parent or parents or person standing in loco parentis.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6998-54; Laws, 1948, ch. 354, § 48; 1950, ch. 412, § 21; 1968, ch. 560, § 1; reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, ch. 473, § 55; reenacted without change, Laws, 1990, ch. 405, § 57, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 71-3-109.
Extraterritorial application.

If an employee who has been hired or is regularly employed in this state receives personal injury by accident arising out of and in the course of his employment while temporarily employed outside of this state, he or his dependents in case of his death shall be entitled to compensation according to the law of this state. This provision shall apply only to those injuries received by the employee within six (6) months after leaving this state unless, prior to the expiration of such six (6) months’ period, the employer has filed with the commission of Mississippi notice that he has elected to extend such coverage a greater period of time.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to an employee whose departure from this state is caused by a permanent assignment or transfer.

Any employee who has been hired or is regularly employed outside of this state and his employer shall be exempted from the provisions of this chapter while such employee is temporarily within this state doing work for his employer if such employer has furnished workmen’s compensation insurance coverage under the workmen’s compensation or similar laws for a state other than this state so as to cover such employee’s employment while in this state, provided the extra-territorial provisions of this chapter are recognized in such other state and provided employers and employees who are covered in this state are likewise exempted from the application of the workmen’s compensation or similar laws of such other state. The benefits under the workmen’s compensation or similar laws of such other state shall be the exclusive remedy against such employer for any injury, whether resulting in death or not, received by such employee while working for such employer in this state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6998-55; Laws, 1948, ch. 354, § 49; reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, ch. 473, § 56; reenacted without change, Laws, 1990, ch. 405, § 58, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 71-3-111.
Mississippi Workers’ Compensation Assigned Risk Plan; commissioner’s duties and responsibilities; temporary joint underwriting association.

The Department of Insurance is directed to promulgate such rules and regulations as will enable the department to provide the “Mississippi Workers’ Compensation Assigned Risk Plan” for the assignment of risks which in good faith are entitled to insurance under this chapter but which, because of unusual conditions and circumstances, are unable to obtain such insurance.

The Commissioner of Insurance is designated as the Director of the Mississippi Workers’ Compensation Assigned Risk Plan, and he shall design the assigned risk plan in such a manner that the plan should become self-supporting with no outside assessments. The commissioner may contract for a safety program.

The Commissioner of Insurance is authorized to advertise and contract with any workers’ compensation insurance carriers that are licensed and writing workers’ compensation insurance within the State of Mississippi or providers of workers’ compensation claims and loss control services within the State of Mississippi to be servicing carriers. A servicing carrier shall provide all insurance services to employers insured under the plan as are otherwise rendered to those covered by policies voluntarily written by companies licensed to write workers’ compensation insurance in the state.

The Commissioner of Insurance may establish the “Mississippi Workers’ Compensation Assigned Risk Pool” as a reinsurance mechanism for the “Mississippi Workers’ Compensation Assigned Risk Plan” to accomplish the equitable distribution of all underwriting profit or loss of the plan to the companies licensed to write workers’ compensation insurance in the state in direct proportion to their share of the total voluntary workers’ compensation premiums written in the state. If established, all insurance companies licensed to write workers’ compensation insurance under this chapter shall be members of and participants in this pool.

The Commissioner of Insurance shall be responsible for the administration of both the “Mississippi Workers’ Compensation Assigned Risk Plan” and the “Mississippi Workers’ Compensation Assigned Risk Pool” but may designate an administrator of either or both, at his discretion. The Commissioner of Insurance may levy special assessments against the Mississippi Workers’ Compensation Assigned Risk Pool, if necessary, to provide funding for administrative expenses.

The commissioner is hereby authorized to establish a temporary joint underwriting association that shall consist of all insurers authorized to write, or engaged in writing, within this state on any basis, workers’ compensation insurance as reported in the companies’ annual statements.

The purpose of the association shall be to provide a market for workers’ compensation insurance on a self-supporting basis.

The association shall not be established nor begin underwriting operations until the commissioner, after due hearing and investigation, has determined that workers’ compensation insurance is not readily available. A determination that such insurance is not readily available shall be necessary before the association begins operations.

Upon such determination, the association shall be authorized to issue policies of workers’ compensation insurance.

If the commissioner determines at any time that workers’ compensation insurance can be made readily available in the voluntary market, the association shall then cease its underwriting operations for such workers’ compensation insurance that has been determined to be available in the voluntary market.

The Commissioner of Insurance is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of this section, to include levying assessments, if necessary, to provide funding for start-up and administrative expenses.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6998-56; Laws, 1948, ch. 354, § 50; reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, ch. 473, § 57; reenacted without change, Laws, 1990, ch. 405, § 59; Laws, 1992, ch. 577, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved May 15, 1992).

§ 71-3-113.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1990, ch 405, § 60, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

[Laws, 1979, ch. 301, § 48; Laws, 1982, ch. 473, § 58]

§ 71-3-115.
Medical Advisory Board; appointment; qualifications; expenses; recommendations.

The Mississippi Workers’ Compensation Commission shall appoint a medical advisory board to serve in an advisory capacity to study the possibility of the use of a medical fee schedule and to provide assistance to the commission in the performance of its functions relating to regulation of medical fees and charges pursuant to Section 71-3-15(3), Mississippi Code of 1972.

Such board shall consist of five (5) members, one (1) appointed from each congressional district as they existed on January 1, 1985. Members of the board shall serve at the will and pleasure of the commission. All members of the medical advisory board shall be health care providers.

Such board shall meet upon the call of the chairman of the Mississippi Workers’ Compensation Commission. The board shall receive per diem and mileage as authorized by Section 25-3-69, Mississippi Code of 1972, for attendance at called meetings to be paid from the administrative expense fund as provided in Section 71-3-97, Mississippi Code of 1972.

The Mississippi Workers’ Compensation Commission shall provide all office space and clerical assistance that might be required by the board.

The Workers’ Compensation Commission shall file a report with the Secretary of the Senate and the Clerk of the House of Representatives not later than December 15, 1987, concerning the result of the medical fee schedule study, together with any recommendations that the commission may consider necessary in regard to the regulation of medical fees and other costs. Such report shall contain any available comparative data generated by the commission or the medical advisory board.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 361, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 19, 1987).

§ 71-3-117.
Review and evaluation of alternative systems of workers’ compensation; expenses; recommendations.

The Mississippi Workers’ Compensation Commission is hereby authorized and directed to review and make recommendations to the Legislature concerning alternative systems of workers’ compensation for the State of Mississippi. The commission shall evaluate (a) the feasibility of group self-insurance and a self-insurance guarantee fund; (b) the deregulation of compensation insurance rates, including the impact of reserving practices, return on investments and profitability on workers’ compensation ratemaking; (c) structural alternatives, such as the utilization of a state fund to operate the compensation system; and (d) the provisions of vocational rehabilitation services for covered employees. The Mississippi Department of Insurance shall cooperate and assist the Workers’ Compensation Commission in preparing its recommendations.

The Mississippi Workers’ Compensation Commission may employ an actuary and such other staff as may be required to properly conduct this study. The expense of this study shall be paid from the administrative expense fund as provided in Section 71-3-97, Mississippi Code of 1972.

The Mississippi Workers’ Compensation Commission shall file its report with the Clerk of the House of Representatives and the Secretary of the Senate, together with recommendations for legislation, no later than December 15, 1987, with respect to the subject matter set forth in paragraphs (1)(a) and (1)(d) and no later than November 1, 1988, with respect to the subject matter set forth in paragraphs (1)(b) and (1)(c).

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 361, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 19, 1987).

§ 71-3-119.
Workers’ Compensation Advisory Council; qualifications; appointment; compensation; expenses; purpose; reports.

There is hereby created the Mississippi Workers’ Compensation Advisory Council composed of individuals who, by their practice, experience and expertise, reflect the general composition of those involved with the workers’ compensation field. The council shall consist of not more than twenty-five (25) members excluding the members of the Mississippi Workers’ Compensation Commission, who shall be ex officio members. The members of such council shall be appointed by the Mississippi Workers’ Compensation Commission within thirty (30) days of March 19, 1987, to a one-year term or until their successors are appointed and qualified. The members of the council shall select one of their number to be chairman. The advisory council shall consider and advise the Mississippi Workers’ Compensation Commission on all matters related to the administration of the Mississippi Workers’ Compensation Law. In its discretion the council may recommend to the Mississippi Workers’ Compensation Commission changes it deems needed in the substance and administration of the Mississippi Workers’ Compensation Law. The council shall report periodically to the Mississippi Workers’ Compensation Commission regarding the performance of its duties and functions.

The members of the advisory council shall receive the per diem under Section 25-3-69 for attendance of meetings of the council and shall be reimbursed for actual and necessary mileage and travel expenses incurred in the discharge of their duties pursuant to Section 25-3-41. The Mississippi Workers’ Compensation Commission may provide personnel to aid the council in the performance of its functions. The amounts allowed to the members of the council for per diem compensation, travel and other council expenses is an expense incurred in the administration of the Mississippi Workers’ Compensation Law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 361, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved March 19, 1987).

§ 71-3-121.
Drug and alcohol testing; employer’s right to demand or administer; presumptions; admissibility of results.

In the event that an employee sustains an injury at work or asserts a work-related injury, the employer shall have the right to administer drug and alcohol testing or require that the employee submit himself to drug and alcohol testing. If the employee has a positive test indicating the presence, at the time of injury, of any drug illegally used or t he use of a valid prescription medication(s) taken contrary to the prescriber’s instructions and/or contrary to label warnings, or eight one-hundredths percent (.08%) or more by weight volume of alcohol in the person’s blood, it shall be presumed that the proximate cause of the injury was the use of a drug illegally, or the use of a valid prescription medication(s) taken contrary to the prescriber’s instructions and/or contrary to label warnings, or the intoxication due to the use of alcohol by the employee. If the employee refuses to submit himself to drug and alcohol testing immediately after the alleged work-related injury, then it shall be presumed that the employee was using a drug illegally, or was using a valid prescription medication(s) contrary to the prescriber’s instructions and/or contrary to label warnings, or was intoxicated due to the use of alcohol at the time of the accident and that the proximate cause of the injury was the use of a drug illegally, or the use of a valid prescription medication(s) taken contrary to the prescriber’s instructions and/or contrary to label warnings, or the intoxication due to the use of alcohol of the employee. The burden of proof will then be placed upon the employee to prove that the use of drugs illegally, or the use of a valid prescription medication(s) taken contrary to the prescriber’s instructions and/or contrary to label warnings, or intoxication due to the use of alcohol was not a contributing cause of the accident in order to defeat the defense of the employer provided under Section 71-3-7.

The results of the drug and alcohol tests, employer-administered or otherwise, shall be considered admissible evidence solely on the issue of causation in the determination of the use of drugs illegally, or the use of a valid prescription medication(s) taken contrary to the prescriber’s instructions and/or contrary to label warnings, or the intoxication due to the use of alcohol of an employee at the time of injury for workers’ compensation purposes under Section 71-3-7.

No cause of action for defamation of character, libel, slander or damage to reputation arises in favor of any person against an employer under the provisions of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 577, § 7; Laws, 2012, ch. 522, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 71-3-123.
Report of commissioner on assigned risk plan and safety programs.

The Commissioner of Insurance shall submit a report consisting of the condition of the assigned risk plan and the safety programs established by insurers in accordance with Chapter 577, Laws of 1992 to the Senate and House Insurance Committees by January 1 of each year, beginning January 1, 1993.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 577, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved May 15, 1992).

§ 71-3-125.
Workers’ compensation claims offices; provision of same services by contract; waiver.

Each insurance carrier or commission approved self-insured employer shall maintain a workers’ compensation claims office, subject to the waiver provisions herein, within the borders of the State of Mississippi beginning July 1, 1993. Alternatively, each insurance carrier or commission approved self-insured employer may provide by contract the same services within the borders of the State of Mississippi beginning July 1, 1993. This claims office shall maintain workers’ compensation claims files and shall be the office responsible to the Mississippi Workers’ Compensation Commission for the proper filing of all commission forms for the employer/insureds. This office shall be the sole contact for the commission for the administration of all claims filed within the jurisdiction of the Mississippi Workers’ Compensation Commission. Authority to issue checks and to pay claims shall be vested in personnel located within the State of Mississippi.

The insurance carrier and self-insured employer shall notify the commission of the address of its claims office before July 1, 1992, and shall report any subsequent changes of address before the effective date of the change. After October 1, 1992, no processing or payment of workers’ compensation claims shall occur outside the State of Mississippi without the specific written waiver by the commission.

Waiver requests must be submitted to the commission in writing and shall not be considered unless the applicant has exercised claims management and filing practices that illustrate proper compliance with the law and other commission regulations. Proper compliance shall be measured by the commission by continued monitoring of the timeliness of reporting by the carrier/self-insured employer and by monitoring the resolution, or lack thereof, of written complaints regarding noncompliance to all aspects of the Mississippi Workers’ Compensation Law and rules of the commission and orders of the administrative law judges, commission or court.

The commission shall prepare a report at least twice each year as to the filing performance, first payment performance and problems resolution of each carrier and self-insured employer during the calendar year beginning January 1, 1993, and each successive year. Carrier’s and self-insured employer’s performance as measured in each calendar year shall be the basis for approval or continuation of the waiver beginning on July 1 of each successive year.

Any and all waivers previously granted by the commission under prior versions of this section are subject to review under this section in effect at the time the waiver request is submitted for approval or continuation.

Any failure to comply with the provisions of Chapter 577, Laws of 1992, shall subject the carrier/self-insured employer to the sanctions of the Workers’ Compensation Law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 577 § 9; Laws, 1993, ch. 552, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved April 13, 1993).

§ 71-3-127.
Use of arbitrators to resolve disputes.

The Workers’ Compensation Commission may utilize one or more arbitrators to resolve disputes under such procedures as prescribed by the commission in its uniform procedure rules.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 577, § 10, eff from and after passage (approved May 15, 1992).